Hawaii, session 2026, HB2224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State's medicaid program, known as med-QUEST, serves some of Hawaii's most vulnerable residents, including low-income families, kupuna, individuals with disabilities, and those living in rural and neighbor island communities.  The legislature further finds that decisions regarding pharmaceutical benefit management can significantly impact pharmacy reimbursement, patience access, and overall healthcare expenditure.  Accordingly, it is in the State's best interest to ensure that the department of human services retains the flexibility necessary to evaluate and implement pharmaceutical benefit management structures that best serve medicaid beneficiaries and participating providers. The legislature further finds that existing limitations on the department's authority constrain the State's ability to modernize medicaid program administration and adapt to evolving health care delivery and pharmaceutical market conditions.  These constraints hinder the department's ability to consider emerging models that are being adopted and evaluated at both the federal and state levels. The purpose of this Act is to restore the department of human services' authority to assess and implement the most effective pharmaceutical benefits management approach for med-QUEST and ensure responsible stewardship of public funds. SECTION 2.  Act 4, Special Session Laws of Hawaii 2005, is amended by amending section 3 to read as follows: "SECTION 3.  [The department of human services shall not take any action to remove pharmaceutical benefits management from managed care plans that provide health care coverage for Hawaii medicaid beneficiaries.] Repealed." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________